src/fst/morphology/stems/particles.lexc
LEXICON Particles
!!! Common
! Singular
ang+Pcle+Dir:ang # ; ! Direct
ng+Pcle+Idr:ng # ; ! Indirect
sa+Pcle+Obl:sa # ; ! Oblique
! Plural
! angmgá+Pcle:mgá # ; ! Direct
! ngmgá+Pcle:mgá # ; ! Indirect
! samgá+Pcle:mgá # ; ! Oblique
mga+Pcle+Pl:mga # ; ! Pluralizer

!!! Personal
! Singular
si+Pcle+Dir:si # ; ! Direct
ni+Pcle+Idr:ni # ; ! Indirect
kay+Pcle+Obl:kay # ; ! Oblique
! Singular
sina+Pcle+Dir:sina # ; ! Direct
nina+Pcle+Idr:nina # ; ! Indirect
kina+Pcle+Obl:kina # ; ! Oblique
